Georgia statutes. 
(2) The consultant shall immediately disclose to such county, municipality, school board, or other local governmental entity any material transaction or relationship, including, but not limited to, that of the consultant, the consultant's employees, or the consultant's agents or subsidiaries, that reasonably could be expected to give rise to a conflict of interest, including, but not limited to, past, present, or known prospective engagements, involvement in litigation or other dispute, client relationships, or other business or financial interest, and shall immediately disclose any material transaction or relationship subsequently discovered during the pendency of the contract or arrangement; and

(3) An acknowledgment that any violation or threatened violation of the agreement may cause irreparable injury to the county, municipality, school board, or other local governmental entity, entitling such county, municipality, school board, or other local governmental entity to seek injunctive relief in addition to all other legal remedies.

(c) Any violation or threatened violation of the agreement may cause irreparable injury to the county, municipality, or other local governmental entity, entitling such county, municipality, or other local governmental entity to seek injunctive relief in addition to all other legal remedies.

(d) (1) This Code section shall not apply to economic development activities that are confidential pursuant to Article 4 of Chapter 18 of Title 50.

(2) This Code section shall not apply to any development authority which shall include any authority created by law or by constitutional amendment for one or more counties or municipalities, or any combination thereof, for the purpose of promoting the development of trade, commerce, industry, and employment opportunities or for other purposes and, without limiting the generality of the foregoing, shall specifically include all authorities created pursuant to Chapter 62 of this title; provided, however, that nothing in this paragraph shall impair or interfere with the provisions of subparagraph (e)(1)(B) of Code Section 36-62-5 regarding reporting of potential conflicts of interest by development authority board members.

(3) An attorney who provides legal services to the county, municipality, school board, or other local government entity shall only be required to disclose the existence of a conflict under this Code section and not the details of such conflict.

(e) Any person may bring an action to declare null and void any purchase in violation of this Code section or to seek injunctive relief and damages against a person who makes a bid or proposal in violation of this Code section.

History

(Code 1981, § 36-80-28, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 41, § 1/HB 315.)

Annotations

Effective date. - This Code section became effective July 1, 2019.

——————————

CHAPTER 81

BUDGETS AND AUDITS

Article 1

Local Government Budgets and Audits.

36-81-1. Legislative intent.

36-81-2. Definitions.

36-81-3. Establishment of fiscal year; requirement of annual balanced budget; adoption of budget ordinances or resolutions generally; budget amendments; uniform chart of accounts.

36-81-4. Appointment of budget officer; performance of duties by governing authority in absence of appointment; utilization of executive budget.

36-81-5. Preparation of proposed budget; submission to governing authority; public review of proposed budget; notice and conduct of budget hearing.

36-81-6. Adoption of budget ordinance or resolution; form of budget.

36-81-7. (See Editor&#8217;s notes.) Requirement of audits; conduct of audits; audit reports; forwarding of audits to state auditor; failure to file or correct deficiencies; public inspection.

36-81-8. (See Editor&#8217;s notes.) Annual local government finances reports and local independent authority indebtedness reports; assistance by Department of Community Affairs; community indicators report.

36-81-8.1. (See Editor&#8217;s notes.) Definitions; grant certification forms; filing with state auditor; forfeiture of funds for noncompliance; no exemption from liability.

36-81-9. Effect of article on other laws generally.

36-81-10. Effect of article on right to make expenditures and raise revenues; effect on home rule powers.

36-81-11. Budget for implementing security plans subject to approval by the governing authority.

Article 2

Audits as Condition for Receipt of State Assistance.

36-81-20. Audits accepted by state; additional audits; section not to limit state's audit authority.

Annotations

Administrative Rules and Regulations. - The Life Sciences Facilities Fund Loan Program Description, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Department of Community Affairs, Chapter 110-25.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Negotiability of county, municipal, school, state, or town warrants, 36 A.L.R. 949.

Negotiability of municipal bonds as affected by reference to fund from which they are to be paid, 42 A.L.R. 1027.

——————————

ARTICLE 1

LOCAL GOVERNMENT BUDGETS AND AUDITS

Annotations

Administrative Rules and Regulations. - Uniform charts of accounts, Official Compilation of the Rules and Regulations of the State of Georgia, Georgia Department of Community Affairs, Subject 110-15-1.

36-81-1. Legislative intent.

Statute text

The intent of this article is to provide minimum budget, accounting, and auditing requirements for local governments so as to provide local taxpayers with an opportunity to gain information concerning the purposes for which local revenues are proposed to be spent and are actually spent and to assist local governments in generally improving local financial management practices while maintaining, preserving, and encouraging the principle of home rule over local matters. It is the further intent of this article to provide a mechanism through which appropriate information may be collected to assist state and local policy makers in carrying out their lawful responsibilities. It is also the intent of this article to provide for the collection and reporting of information so as to assist local taxpayers and local policy makers in understanding and evaluating local government service delivery and operations.

History

(Ga. L. 1980, p. 1738, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1575, § 1.)

36-81-2. Definitions.

Statute text

As used in this article, the term:

(1) "Budget" means a plan of financial operation embodying an estimate of proposed expenditures during a budget period and the proposed means of financing them.

(2) "Budget officer" means that local government official charged with budget preparation and administration for the local government. The official title of the local government budget officer shall be as provided by local law, charter, ordinance, or appropriate resolution of the governing authority.

(3) "Budget ordinance," "ordinance," or "resolution" means that governmental action which appropriates revenues and fund balances for specified purposes, functions, or activities for a budget period.

(4) "Budget period" means the period for which a budget is proposed or a budget ordinance or resolution is adopted.

(5) "Capital projects fund" means a fund used to account for financial resources to be used for the acquisition or construction of major capital facilities other than those financed by resources from proprietary type activities which are accounted for in enterprise funds or those financed with funds held by the local government in a trustee capacity.

(6) "Debt service fund" means a fund used to account for the accumulation of resources for and the payment of general long-term debt principal and interest.

(7) "Enterprise fund" means a fund used to account for operations that are financed and operated in a manner similar to private business enterprises where the intent of the governing authority is that the costs of providing goods and services to the general public on a continuing basis be financed or recovered primarily through user charges or where the governing authority has decided that periodic determination of revenues earned, expenses incurred, or net income is appropriate for capital maintenance, public policy, management control, accountability, or other purposes. For purposes of this paragraph, the term "costs" means expenses, including depreciation.

(8) "Fiduciary fund" means those trust and agency funds used to account for assets held by a local government in a trustee capacity or as an agent for individuals, private organizations, other governmental units, or other funds.

(9) "Fiscal year" means the period for which a budget is proposed or a budget ordinance or resolution is adopted for the local government's general fund, each special revenue fund, if any, and each debt service fund, if any.

(10) "Fund" means a fiscal and accounting entity with a self-balancing set of accounts recording cash and other financial resources, together with all related liabilities and residual equities or balances, and changes therein, which is segregated for the purpose of carrying on specific activities or attaining certain objectives in accordance with special regulations, restrictions, or limitations.

(11) "General fund" means the fund used to account for all financial resources except those required to be accounted for in another fund.

(12) "Governing authority" means that official or group of officials responsible for governance of the unit of local government.

(13) "Internal service fund" means a fund used to account for the financing of goods or services provided by one department or agency to other departments or agencies of the governmental unit or to other governmental units on a cost-reimbursement basis.

(14) "Legal level of control" means the lowest level of budgetary detail at which a local government's management or budget officer may not reassign resources without approval of the governing authority. The legal level of control shall be, at a minimum, expenditures for each department for each fund for which a budget is required. This does not preclude the governing authority of a local government from establishing a legal level of control at a more detailed level of budgetary control than the minimum required legal level of control.

(15) "Special revenue fund" means a fund used to account for the proceeds of specific revenue sources, other than those for major capital projects or those held by the government in a trustee capacity, that are legally restricted to expenditure for specified purposes.

(16) "Unit of local government," "unit," or "local government" means a municipality, county, consolidated city-county government, or other political subdivision of the state. Such terms do not include any local school district or board of education. For purposes of this paragraph, "county" includes any county officer who is paid in whole or in part on a salary basis and over whom the county governing authority exercises budgetary authority.

History

(Ga. L. 1980, p. 1738, § 3; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 36; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1611, § 1.)

36-81-3. Establishment of fiscal year; requirement of annual balanced budget; adoption of budget ordinances or resolutions generally; budget amendments; uniform chart of accounts.

Statute text

(a) The governing authority shall establish by ordinance, local law, or appropriate resolution a fiscal year for the operations of the local government.

(b) (1) Each unit of local government shall adopt and operate under an annual balanced budget for the general fund, each special revenue fund, and each debt service fund in use by the local government. The annual balanced budget shall be adopted by ordinance or resolution and administered in accordance with this article.

(2) Each unit of local government shall adopt and operate under a project-length balanced budget for each capital projects fund in use by the government. The project-length balanced budget shall be adopted by ordinance or resolution in the year that the project initially begins and shall be administered in accordance with this article. The project-length balanced budget shall appropriate total expenditures for the duration of the capital project.

(3) A budget ordinance or resolution is balanced when the sum of estimated revenues and appropriated fund balances is equal to appropriations.

(4) Nothing contained in this Code section shall preclude a local government from adopting a budget for any funds used by the local government other than those specifically identified in paragraphs (1) and (2) of this subsection, including enterprise funds, internal service funds, and fiduciary funds.

(c) For each fiscal year beginning on or after January 1, 1982, each unit of local government shall adopt and utilize a budget ordinance or resolution as provided in this article.

(d) Nothing contained in this Code section shall preclude a local government from amending its budget so as to adapt to changing governmental needs during the budget period. Amendments shall be made as follows, unless otherwise provided by charter or local law:

(1) Any increase in appropriation at the legal level of control of the local government, whether accomplished through a change in anticipated revenues in any fund or through a transfer of appropriations among departments, shall require the approval of the governing authority. Such amendment shall be adopted by ordinance or resolution;

(2) Transfers of appropriations within any fund below the local government's legal level of control shall require only the approval of the budget officer; and

(3) The governing authority of a local government may amend the legal level of control to establish a more detailed level of budgetary control at any time during the budget period. Said amendment shall be adopted by ordinance or resolution.

(e) The Department of Community Affairs, in cooperation with the Association County Commissioners of Georgia and the Georgia Municipal Association, shall develop local government uniform charts of accounts. The uniform charts of accounts, including any subsequent revisions thereto, shall require approval of the state auditor prior to final adoption by the Department of Community Affairs. All units of local government shall adopt and use such initial uniform charts of accounts within 18 months following adoption of the uniform charts of accounts by the Department of Community Affairs. The department shall adopt the initial local government uniform charts of accounts no later than December 31, 1998. The department shall be authorized to grant a waiver delaying adoption of the initial uniform charts of accounts for a period of time not to exceed two years upon a clear demonstration that conversion of the accounting system of the requesting local government, within the time period specified in this subsection, would be unduly burdensome.

(f) The department's implementation of subsection (e) of this Code section shall be subject to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the "Georgia Administrative Procedure Act."

History

(Ga. L. 1980, p. 1738, § 4; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1997, p. 1575, § 2; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1611, § 2; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1395, § 1.)

Annotations

Cross references. - Audits of counties and municipalities, § 36-60-8.

Fiscal year for state and units of state government, § 45-6-2.

State auditor generally, T. 50, C. 6.

JUDICIAL DECISIONS

Cited in May v. County Comm'rs, 227 Ga. App. 878, 490 S.E.2d 546 (1997); Pelphrey v. Cobb County, 547 F.3d 1263 (11th Cir. 2008).

OPINIONS OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL

Regional development center is not subject to the minimum budget and auditing requirements set forth in O.C.G.A. Art. 1, Ch. 81, T. 36; however, a center is subject to public accountability under other provisions of state law. 1990 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 90-37.

Budget amendments. - Requirement that budget amendments be adopted by ordinance or resolution is not satisfied by the adoption of a "blanket amendment" in the local government's budget resolution. 1999 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 99-3.

Adoption of a blanket amendment in local government's budget resolution. - Requirement that amendments to the budgets of local governments be adopted by ordinance or resolution is not satisfied by the adoption of a "blanket amendment" in the local government's budget resolution. 1999 Op. Att'y Gen. No. 99-3.

RESEARCH REFERENCES

ALR. - Validity, construction, and application of state constitutional and statutory balanced budget provisions, 82 A.L.R.6th 497.

36-81-4. Appointment of budget officer; performance of duties by governing authority in absence of appointment; utilization of executive budget.

Statute text

(a) Unless provided to the contrary by local charter or local Act, each local government may appoint a budget officer to serve at the will of the governing authority.

(b) In those units of local government in which there is no budget officer, the governing authority shall perform all duties of the budget officer as set forth in Code Section 36-81-5.

(c) Nothing in this Code section shall preclude the utilization of an executive budget, under which an elected or appointed official, authorized by charter or local law and acting as the chief executive of the governmental unit, exercises the initial budgetary policy-making function, while another individual, designated as provided in this Code section as budget officer, exercises the administrative functions of budgetary preparation and control.

History

(Ga. L. 1980, p. 1738, § 5.)

36-81-5. Preparation of proposed budget; submission to governing authority; public review of proposed budget; notice and conduct of budget hearing.

Statute text

(a) By the date established by each governing authority, in such manner and form as may be necessary to effect this article, and consistent with the local government's accounting system, the budget officer shall prepare a proposed budget for the local government for the ensuing budget period.

(b) The proposed budget shall, at a minimum, be an estimate of the financial requirements at the legal level of control for each fund requiring a budget for the appropriate budget period and shall be in such form and detail, with such supporting information and justifications, as may be prescribed by the budget officer or the governing authority. The budget document, at a minimum, shall provide, for the appropriate budget period, a statement of the amount budgeted for anticipated revenues by source and the amount budgeted for expenditures at the legal level of control. In accordance with the minimum required legal level of control, the budget document shall, at a minimum, provide a statement of the amount budgeted for expenditures by department for each fund for which a budget is required. This does not preclude the governing authority of a local government from preparing a budget document or establishing a legal level of control at a more detailed level of budgetary control than the minimum required legal level of control.

(c) On the date established by each governing authority, the proposed budget shall be submitted to the governing authority for that body's review prior to enactment of the budget ordinance or resolution.

(d) On the day that the proposed budget is submitted to the governing authority for consideration, a copy of the budget shall be placed in a public location which is convenient to the residents of the unit of local government. The governing authority shall make every effort to provide convenient access to the residents during reasonable business hours so as to accord every opportunity to the public to review the budget prior to adoption by the governing authority. A copy of the budget shall also be made available, upon request, to the news media.

(e) A statement advising the residents of the local unit of government of the availability of the proposed budget shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation within the jurisdiction of the governing authority. The notice shall be published during the week in which the proposed budget is submitted to the governing authority. In addition, the statement shall also advise the residents that a public hearing will be held at which time any persons wishing to be heard on the budget may appear. The statement shall be a prominently displayed advertisement or news article and shall not be placed in that section of the newspaper where legal notices appear.

(f) At least one week prior to the meeting of the governing authority at which adoption of the budget ordinance or resolution will be considered, the governing authority shall conduct a public hearing, at which time any persons wishing to be heard on the budget may appear.

(g) (1) The governing authority shall give notice of the time and place of the budget hearing required by subsection (f) of this Code section at least one week before the budget hearing is held. The notice shall be published in a newspaper of general circulation within the jurisdiction of the governing authority. The statement shall be a prominently displayed advertisement or news article and shall not be placed in that section of the newspaper where legal notices appear.

(2) The notice required by paragraph (1) of this subsection may be included in the statement published pursuant to subsection (e) of this Code section in lieu of separate publication of the notice.

(h) Nothing in this Code section shall be deemed to preclude the conduct of further budget hearings if the governing body deems such hearings necessary and complies with the requirements of subsection (e) of this Code section.

History

(Ga. L. 1980, p. 1738, § 6; Ga. L. 1984, p. 818, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1611, § 3.)

36-81-6. Adoption of budget ordinance or resolution; form of budget.

Statute text

(a) On a date after the conclusion of the hearing required in subsection (f) of Code Section 36-81-5, the governing authority shall adopt a budget ordinance or resolution making appropriations in such sums as the governing authority may deem sufficient, whether greater or less than the sums presented in the proposed budget. The budget ordinance or resolution shall be adopted at a public meeting which shall be advertised in accordance with the procedures set forth in subsection (e) of Code Section 36-81-5 at least one week prior to the meeting.

(b) The budget may be prepared in any form that the governing authority deems most efficient in enabling it to make the fiscal policy decisions embodied in the budget, but such budget shall be subject to the provisions of this article.

History

(Ga. L. 1980, p. 1738, § 7; Ga. L. 1984, p. 818, § 2; Ga. L. 1987, p. 3, § 36; Ga. L. 1998, p. 1611, § 4.)

36-81-7. (See Editor&#8217;s notes.) Requirement of audits; conduct of audits; audit reports; forwarding of audits to state auditor; failure to file or correct deficiencies; public inspection.

Statute text

(a) (1) Beginning with the local government fiscal year which ends between July 1, 1994, and June 30, 1995, the governing authority of each unit of local government having a population in excess of 1,500 persons according to the latest estimate of population by the United States Bureau of the Census or its successor agency or expenditures of $550,000.00 or more shall provide for and cause to be made an annual audit of the financial affairs and transactions of all funds and activities of the local government for each fiscal year of the local government.

(2) The governing authority of each local unit of government not included in paragraph (1) of this subsection shall provide for and cause to be made the audit required pursuant to paragraph (1) of this subsection not less often than once every two fiscal years. Audits performed pursuant to this paragraph shall be for both fiscal years.

(3) The governing authority of each local unit of government having expenditures of less than $550,000.00 in that government's most recently ended fiscal year may elect to provide for and cause to be made, in lieu of the biennial audit otherwise required under paragraph (2) of this subsection, an annual report of agreed upon procedures for that fiscal year. The agreed upon procedures shall include as a minimum: proof and reconciliation of cash, confirmation of cash balances, a listing of bank balances by bank, a statement of cash receipts and cash disbursements, a review of compliance with state law, and a report of agreed upon procedures. This agreed upon procedures report shall be in a format prescribed by the state auditor and shall constitute an annual audit report for purposes of and within the meaning of the requirements of subsections (d) through (g) of this Code section. The Department of Community Affairs is authorized to assist requesting local governments in preparing agreed upon procedures reports required under this paragraph and in establishing record-keeping procedures needed in preparing those reports and is further authorized to charge those local governments reasonable fees for that assistance. To the extent that the state auditor is able to perform the agreed upon procedures, the governing body may contract with the state auditor.

(4) At the option of the governing authority, an audit may be made at a lesser interval than one year.

(b) The audits of each local government shall be conducted in accordance with generally accepted government auditing standards. Each audit shall also contain a statement of any agreement or arrangement under which the local unit of government has assumed any actual or potential liability for the obligations of any governmental or private agency, authority, or instrumentality. Such statement shall include the purpose of the agreement or arrangement, shall identify the agency, authority, or instrumentality upon whose obligations the unit of local government is or may become liable, and shall state the amount of actual liability and the maximum amount of potential liability of the local government under the agreement or arrangement. To the extent that the state auditor is able to provide comparable auditing services, the governing body may contract with the state auditor.

(c) All annual audit reports of local units of government shall contain at least the following:

(1) Financial statements prepared in conformity with generally accepted governmental accounting principles, setting forth the financial condition and results of operation of each fund and activity of the local government and such financial statements shall be the representation of the local government; and

(2) The opinion of the performing auditor with respect to the financial statement; in addition to an explanation of any qualification or disclaimers contained in the opinion, such opinion shall also disclose, in accordance with generally accepted government auditing standards, any apparent material violation of state or local law discovered during the audit.

(d) (1) Each annual audit report of a local unit of government shall be completed and a copy of the report forwarded to the state auditor within 180 days after the close of the unit's fiscal year. In addition to the audit report, the local unit of government shall forward to the state auditor, within 30 days after the audit report due date, written comments on the findings and recommendations in the report, including a plan for corrective action taken or planned and comments on the status of corrective action taken on prior findings. If corrective action is not necessary, the written comments should include a statement describing the reason it is not. In the case of units provided for in paragraph (2) of subsection (a) of this Code section, the audit reports for both fiscal periods shall be submitted within 180 days after the close of each second fiscal year and the written comments shall be submitted within 30 days after the audit report due date.

(2) The state auditor shall review the audit report and written comments submitted to the auditor's office to ensure that it meets the requirements for audits of local governments. If the state auditor finds the requirements for audits of local governments have not been complied with, the state auditor shall within 60 days of receipt of the audit or the written comments notify the governing authority and the auditor who performed the audit and shall submit to them a list of deficiencies to be corrected. A copy of this notification shall also be sent by the state auditor to each member of the General Assembly whose senatorial or representative district includes any part of the unit of local government.

(3) If the state auditor has not received any required audit or written comments by the date specified in paragraph (1) of this subsection, the state auditor shall within 30 days of such date notify the unit of local government that the audit has not been received as required by law. A copy of this notification shall also be sent by the state auditor to each member of the General Assembly whose senatorial or representative district includes any part of the unit of local government.

(4) The state auditor, for good cause shown by those local units in which an audit is in the process of being conducted or will promptly be conducted, may waive the requirement for completion of the audit within 180 days. Such waiver shall be for an additional period of not more than 180 days and no such waiver shall be granted for more than two successive years to the same unit of local government.

(5) No state agency shall make or transmit any state grant funds to any local government which has failed to provide all the audits required by law within the preceding five years.

(e) A copy of the report and of any comments made by the state auditor pursuant to paragraph (2) of subsection (d) of this Code section shall be maintained as a public record for public inspection during the regular working hours at the principal office of the local government. Those units of local government not having a principal office shall provide a notification to the public as to the location of and times during which the public may inspect the report.

(f) Upon a failure, refusal, or neglect to have an annual audit made, or a failure to file a copy of the annual audit report with the state auditor, or a failure to correct auditing deficiencies noted by the state auditor, the state auditor shall cause a prominent notice to be published in the legal organ of, and any other newspapers of general circulation within, the unit of local government. Such notice shall be a prominently displayed advertisement or news article and shall not be placed in that section of the newspaper where legal notices appear. Such notice shall be published twice and shall state that the governing authority of the unit of local government has failed or refused, as the case may be, to file an audit report or to correct auditing deficiencies, as the case may be, for the fiscal year or years in question. Such notice shall further state that such failure or refusal is in violation of state law.

(g) The state auditor may waive the requirement of correction of auditing deficiencies for a period of one year from the required audit filing date, provided evidence is presented that substantial progress is being made towards removing the cause of the need for the waiver. No such waiver for the same set of deficiencies shall be granted for more than two successive years to the same local government.

History

(Ga. L. 1980, p. 1738, § 8; Ga. L. 1984, p. 818, §§ 3, 4; Ga. L. 1987, p. 349, § 1; Ga. L. 1993, p. 717, § 1; Ga. L. 1994, p. 1083, §§ 2-6; Ga. L. 1995, p. 10, § 36; Ga. L. 2004, p. 585, § 2; Ga. L. 2019, p. 569, § 1/HB 456.)

Annotations

The 2019 amendment, effective July 1, 2019, substituted "$550,000.00" for "$300,000.00" in paragraph (a)(1) and in the first sentence of paragraph (a)(3).

Cross references. - Audits of counties and municipalities, § 36-60-8.

Fiscal year for state and units of state government, § 45-6-2.

State auditor generally, T. 50, C. 6.

Editor's notes. - Ga. L. 1994, p. 1083, § 6, not codified by the General Assembly until 1995, provides: "No state agency shall make or transmit any state grant funds to any local government which has failed to provide all the audits required by law within the preceding five years."

For application of this statute in 2020, see Executive Order 04.23.20.02.

A listing of Executive Orders issued in 2020 can be found at https://gov.georgia.gov/executive-action/executive-orders/2020-executive-orders.

36-81-8. (See Editor&#8217;s notes.) Annual local government finances reports and local independent authority indebtedness reports; assistance by Department of Community Affairs; community indicators report.

Statute text

(a) As used in this Code section, the term "local independent authority" means each local public body corporate and politic created in and for a county, municipality, consolidated government, or combination thereof, which is authorized to issue bonds under the Constitution and laws of this state.

(b) (1) (A) Each unit of local government shall submit an annual report of local government finances to the Department of Community Affairs. The report shall include the revenues, expenditures, assets, and debts of all funds and agencies of the local government, and other such information as may be reasonably requested by the department. Such annual report shall further identify the total amount of speeding fine revenue collected by the local government.

(B) Each unit of local government which levies a tax pursuant to Article 3 of Chapter 13 of Title 48 shall also submit a schedule of all revenues therefrom which are expended for the promotion of tourism, conventions, and trade shows or any other tourism related purpose which is specified under Code Section 48-13-51. Such schedule shall identify both the project or projects involved and the contracted entity involved in each such expenditure.

(2) Each local independent authority shall submit an annual report of indebtedness to the Department of Community Affairs. Such report shall include the revenues, expenditures, assets, and debts of all funds of the local independent authority and shall describe any actions taken by such local independent authority to incur indebtedness.

(3) The local government finances report and the local independent authority indebtedness report shall be filed on forms promulgated by the department and shall be submitted within the requested time periods established by the department.

(c) The department shall have the authority to require local governments and local independent authorities to submit the reports as provided for in subsection (b) of this Code section as a condition of such local government or local independent authority receiving state appropriated funds from the department. Furthermore, a local government authority or a local independent authority shall not incur debt or credit obligations until such time as it meets such reporting requirement. Failure to comply with the reporting requirement shall have no adverse effect on any outstanding debt or credit obligation of any local government authority or local independent authority. Upon the receipt of the report of local government finance from a local government or the report of local independent authority debt from a local independent authority, the department is authorized to release any state appropriated grant funds that may be due at such time to the local government or the local independent authority.

(d) The department's implementation of subsections (b) and (c) of this Code section shall be subject to Chapter 13 of Title 50, the "Georgia Administrative Procedure Act"; and the department is specifically directed to promulgate the forms provided for in subsection (b) of this Code section in the manner provided for promulgation of rules under Chapter 13 of Title 50.

(e) Utilizing information contained in audit reports of local governments filed with the state auditor, the report of county or municipal finances filed with the Department of Community Affairs, and other available state or federal information of public record, the Department of Community Affairs shall prepare annually a report on local government finances. Utilizing information contained in reports of indebtedness returned to the Department of Community Affairs, the Department of Community Affairs shall prepare annually a report on indebtedness of local independent authorities. The local government finances report shall be filed on January 15 of each year, beginning January 15, 1985, and the local independent authority indebtedness report shall be filed on January 15 of each year, beginning January 1, 1990, with the Governor, the Speaker of the House of Representatives, the President of the Senate, the chairman of the House Ways and Means Committee, the chairman of the House State Planning and Community Affairs Committee, the chairman of the Senate Finance Committee, and the chairman of the Senate State and Local Governmental Operations Committee, as well as with the chief elected official or chief appointed official of each local unit of government and each local independent authority and member of the General Assembly upon request.

(f) The local government finances report and the local independent authority indebtedness report shall be organized, within the limits of available resources, in such a manner as to allow for reasonable comparative analysis of local government revenues and expenditures and for reasonable comparative analysis of local independent authority debt.

(g) The department, in addition to its other duties, shall assist local units of government and local independent authorities in fulfilling the requirements of this article. The department shall coordinate its technical assistance efforts with the state auditor, the University System of Georgia, the Association County Commissioners of Georgia, the Georgia Municipal Association, and the Georgia Society of Certified Public Accountants and should coordinate with any other organizations interested and currently active in local government financial management so as to ensure that coordination of training and assistance is maintained. The department may contract or subcontract with other public or private agencies to provide assistance to local units of government or local independent authorities.

(h) The department, either in conjunction with the local government finances report or separately, shall prepare a community indicators report for each local unit of government having annual expenditures of $250,000.00 or more as indicated pursuant to the most recent Report of Local Government Finances. The community indicators report shall include data on local government services, administration, and community characteristics. The department shall have the authority to require local governments to submit reports on local government services and operations as a condition of such local government receiving state appropriated funds from the department. Such reports shall be obtained utilizing the local government finance survey as provided in subsection (b) of this Code section and the local government operations survey collected by the department. The department shall develop the community indicators report in cooperation with the Association County Commissioners of Georgia and the Georgia Municipal Association and shall prepare the report on or before December 31, 1998, and annually thereafter.

History
